Utah statutes.
78B-5-803.   Receipt may be demanded as condition to payment or deposit.

A person who pays money, or delivers an instrument or property, is entitled to a receipt from the person to whom the payment or delivery is made, and may demand a proper signature to the receipt as a condition of the payment or delivery.

